Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2140.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 5799YH (2) 91 ss/ko H.F. 2140 Section 1. Section 126.22, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. Permit required. A person shall not 3 distribute nitrous oxide in this state without a nitrous oxide 4 distribution permit issued by the department of inspections, 5 appeals, and licensing. A nitrous oxide distribution permit 6 holder shall maintain a log of each sale of nitrous oxide. The 7 department of inspections, appeals, and licensing shall adopt 8 rules pursuant to chapter 17A to implement this subsection. 9